Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-7.5] Exemption from tax on
income and obligations. Income earned and obligations issued by a
nonprofit entity determined to be a "public housing agency" pursuant
to section 3(b)(6) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, as amended, and
which income and obligations are declared by the United States Department of
Housing and Urban Development to be exempt from all taxation imposed by the
United States pursuant to section 11(b) of the Act, shall be exempt from all
taxation now or hereafter imposed by the State. [L 2013, c 146, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next